Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4149.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1280h. (1) By not later than July 1, 2026, the board of a school district or an intermediate school district or the board of directors of a public school academy shall post a link to the MI School Data website's parent dashboard for school transparency for each school operated by the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy on the school district's, intermediate school district's, or public school academy's public website. (2) Subject to appropriation, by not later than July 1, 2027, and by July 1 of each year thereafter, a school district, an intermediate school district, or a public school academy shall annually notify the parent or legal guardian of each student enrolled in a school operated by the school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. The annual notification must include all of the following: (a) Data for the school from the education dashboard of the MI School Data website. (b) The school's performance on state assessments by subject area from the parent dashboard of the MI School Data website. (3) CEPI shall expand the information included in the education dashboard of the MI School Data website to include data from the parent dashboard for school transparency of the MI School Data website. CEPI shall ensure that the MI School Data website includes a function to compare the information from the education dashboard of the MI School Data website for the public schools in this state. As used in this subsection, "CEPI" means the center for educational performance and information created in section 94a of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1694a.